Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2840.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.701 of Title 68, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026,
there shall be allowed as a credit against the tax imposed pursuant
to Section 2355 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes in the amount
of One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) for a member of the
Oklahoma National Guard who resides outside a fifty-mile radius from
their assigned home station.
B. The credit authorized by this section shall not be used to
reduce the income tax liability to less than zero (0).
Req. No. 11147 Page 1

C. To the extent not used, the credit authorized by this
section may be carried over, in order, to each of the five (5)
subsequent taxable years.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11147 MAH 01/02/25


















Req. No. 11147 Page 2